District of Columbia statutes.
31-3451.07

Hearings.

(a)

A health organization may request a confidential department hearing, on a record, to challenge a determination or action if the Commissioner notifies it of the following:

(1)

An adjusted RBC report;

(2)

(A)

The health organization’s RBC plan or revised RBC plan is unsatisfactory; and

(B)

The notification constitutes a Regulatory Action Level Event;

(3)

The health organization has failed to adhere to its RBC plan or revised RBC plan and that the failure has a substantial adverse effect on the ability of the health organization to eliminate the Company Action Level Event in accordance with its RBC plan or revised RBC plan; or

(4)

A corrective order.

(b)

The health organization shall notify the Commissioner of its request for a hearing within 5 days after a notification described in subsection (a) of this section. Upon receipt of the health organization’s request for a hearing, the Commissioner shall set a date for the hearing, which shall be no less than 10, or more than 30, days after the date of the health organization’s request.

June 18, 2003, D.C. Law 14-312, § 107, 50 DCR 306

History

This section is referenced in § 31-3451.01, § 31-3451.03, and § 31-3451.04.

Section References

2001 Ed., § 31-3851.07.

Prior Codifications